District of Columbia statutes.
50-1505.04

Mayor to make rules and regulations.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-157, § 7, 25 DCR 6995
1981 Ed., § 40-114.
1973 Ed., § 40-114.